Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.060

Water redemption fund—Trust fund.

All moneys paid into or collected for the water redemption fund shall be used for the payment of principal and interest of the water redemption bonds issued under the authority of this chapter and no part thereof while any of said bonds are outstanding and unpaid, shall be diverted to any other fund or use: PROVIDED, That when both principal and interest on all water redemption bonds issued and outstanding have been paid, any unexpended balance remaining in the fund may be transferred to the general fund or such other fund as the city or town council may direct.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.060. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 8; RRS s 9154-8.]